District of Columbia statutes.
6-1062.01

Short title.

This part may be cited as the “New Town at Capital City Market Revitalization Development and Public/Private Partnership Act of 2006”.

Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-278, § 201, 54 DCR 895

History